Utah statutes.
17B-1-1205.   Property owner or interested person may appear in validation
proceedings -- Failure to appear.
(1)  An owner of property within the district or a person interested in a
contract or proposed contract that is the subject of a validation petition may
appear and answer or otherwise plead in response to the validation petition:
(a)  at any time before the hearing under Section 17B-1-1203; or
(b)  within any additional period of time that the district court allows.
(2)  If a person fails to appear and answer or otherwise plead in the time
allowed under Subsection (1):
(a)  the allegations of the validation petition shall be considered admitted
by that person; and
(b)  that person may not participate in the validation proceedings.
